Utah statutes.
76-8-107.   Alteration of proposed legislative bill or resolution.
Every person who fraudulently alters the draft of any bill or resolution which
has been presented to either of the houses composing the Legislature to be
passed or adopted, with intent to procure its being passed or adopted by
either house, or certified by the presiding officer of either house in
language different from that intended by such house, is guilty of a felony of
the third degree.
